Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB602.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52COPIOID STEWARDSHIPSec.52C01. Scope of chapter.52C02. Definitions.52C03. Licenses generally.52C04. Fees and assessments.52C05. Opioid Reparation and Accountability Fund.52C06. Reports to department.1234567891011121314151617181920 52C07. Opiate Epidemic Response Advisory Council.52C08. Grants.52C09. Annual reports.52C10. Rules and regulations.§ 52C01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to opioid stewardship.§ 52C02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Controlled substance." As defined in section 2(b) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act." The act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act . "Cosmetic." As defined in section 2(b) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Council." The Opiate Epidemic Response Advisory Council."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Device." As defined in section 2(b) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Distribute." As defined in section 2(b) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Distributor." As defined in section 2(b) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Drug." As defined in section 2(b) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Fund." The Opioid Reparation and Accountability Fund established under section 52C05 (relating to Opioid Reparation and Accountability Fund).20250HB0602PN0610 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Manufacture." As defined in section 2(b) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Manufacturer." A person lawfully authorized to manufacture a drug or controlled substance."Opiate." As defined in section 2(b) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Opioid." Any of the following:(1) A preparation or derivative of opium.(2) A synthetic narcotic that has opiate-like effects but is not derived from opium.(3) A group of naturally occurring peptides that bind at or otherwise influence opiate receptors, including an opioid agonist."Pharmacy." As defined in section 2(12) of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act."Secretary." The Secretary of Health of the Commonwealth."Unit." The individual dosage form of a particular drug product that is prescribed to a patient, with one unit being equal to one tablet, capsule, patch, syringe, milliliter or gram.§ 52C03. Licenses generally.(a) Requirements.--A person may not act as a drug manufacturer or distributor without first obtaining a license from the department and paying an applicable fee under this chapter.(b) Term.--A license shall be valid for one year.(c) Renewal.--(1) A license must be renewed annually.(2) An application for a license renewal shall be 20250HB0602PN0610 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accompanied by the same fee as for initial license application.(d) Applications.--(1) A person seeking a license as a drug manufacturer or distributor, or seeking to renew a license as a drug manufacturer or distributor, shall complete an application and submit the application to the department for review and approval.(2) Applications shall be on forms prescribed by the secretary.§ 52C04. Fees and assessments.(a) Initial license application fees.--(1) The initial license application fee for a manufacturer or distributor of a controlled substance containing an opiate and listed in section 4 of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act shall be $27,500.(2) The initial license application fee for a manufacturer or distributor of a drug that is not specified under paragraph (1) or of a device only shall be $2,500.(b) Assessments.--(1) In addition to the fees specified under subsection (a), the department shall annually assess an opiate product registration fee on a manufacturer of an opiate that annually sells, delivers or distributes within or into this Commonwealth 2,000,000 or more units of an opiate, as reported to the department under section 52C06 (relating to reports to department).(2) By April 1, 2026, and each April 1 thereafter, the department shall notify each manufacturer described under 20250HB0602PN0610 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph (1) that the manufacturer is required to pay an annual assessment of $250,000.(c) Evaluation.--The department shall evaluate every two years the fees and assessments under this section and whether the fees and assessments under this section have impacted the prescribing practices for opiates by reducing the number of opiate prescriptions issued during the previous calendar year or have caused any unintended consequences in the availability of opiates for the treatment of chronic or intractable pain to the extent that the department has the ability to effectively identify a correlation. The following shall apply:(1) The department may access the data reported under section 52C06 to conduct the evaluation.(2) As soon as practicable after completion of the evaluation, the department shall submit the results of its evaluation to the following:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Notice.--Upon any change to the amount of the fee or assessment under this section, the department shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The new fee or assessment shall take effect upon publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(e) Refunds.--20250HB0602PN0610 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), if the department rejects a license application or license renewal application, the department shall return the fee that accompanied the application.(2) The department may retain all or part of the fee if the license application or license renewal application was rejected based wholly or partially on false information furnished by the applicant in the application.(3) A manufacturer or distributor shall not be entitled to a full or partial refund of a fee or assessment under this section if the manufacturer or distributor ceases to do business during the year covered by the fee or assessment.§ 52C05. Opioid Reparation and Accountability Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Opioid Reparation and Accountability Fund is established as a restricted account in the State Treasury.(b) Deposits.--(1) The department shall deposit the fees remitted under section 52C04 (relating to fees and assessments) into the fund.(2) Interest accrued on money received under section 52C04 shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Use.-- The money deposited into the fund may only be used for the purposes specified under this chapter.(d) Appropriations.--Money in the fund shall not lapse and is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes stated in this section.§ 52C06. Reports to department.(a) Manufacturers and distributors.--Beginning March 1, 2026, and each March 1 thereafter, each manufacturer and each 20250HB0602PN0610 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributor shall report to the department every sale, delivery or other distribution of an opiate within or into this Commonwealth, which occurred during the previous calendar year, to a practitioner, pharmacy, hospital, veterinary hospital or other person that is permitted to possess controlled substances for administration or dispensing to patients.(b) Pharmacy owners.--Beginning March 1, 2026, and each March 1 thereafter, each owner of a pharmacy with at least one location within this Commonwealth shall report to the department any intracompany delivery or distribution into this Commonwealth of an opiate, to the extent that the delivery or distribution is not reported to the department by a licensed distributor owned by, under contract to or otherwise operating on behalf of the owner of the pharmacy. The following shall apply:(1) Reporting must be in the manner and format specified by the department for deliveries and distributions that occurred during the previous calendar year.(2) The report must include the following:(i) The name of the manufacturer or distributor from which the owner of the pharmacy ultimately purchased the opiate.(ii) The amount of the purchase and date that the purchase occurred.§ 52C07. Opiate Epidemic Response Advisory Council.(a) Establishment.--The Opiate Epidemic Response Advisory Council is established within the department.(b) Purposes.--The council shall develop and implement a comprehensive and effective Statewide effort to address the opioid addiction and overdose epidemic in this Commonwealth, with special attention given to the following:20250HB0602PN0610 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Prevention and education, including public education and awareness for adults and youth, prescriber education, the development and sustainability of opioid overdose prevention and education programs and providing financial support to local law enforcement agencies for opiate antagonist programs.(2) Training on the treatment of opioid addiction, including the use of all United States Food and Drug Administration-approved opioid addiction medications, detoxification, relapse prevention, patient assessment, individual treatment planning, counseling, recovery supports and other best practices.(3) The expansion and enhancement of a continuum of care for opioid-related substance use disorders, including primary prevention, early intervention, treatment, recovery and aftercare services.(4) The development of measures to assess and protect the ability of cancer patients and survivors, individuals with life-threatening illnesses, individuals suffering from severe chronic pain and individuals at the end stages of life, who legitimately need prescription pain medications, to maintain their quality of life by accessing pain medications without facing unnecessary barriers.(c) Duties.--The council shall:(1) Review Federal, State and local initiatives and activities related to education, prevention, treatment and services for individuals and families experiencing and affected by opioid use disorder.(2) Establish priorities to address this Commonwealth's opioid epidemic, for the purpose of recommending initiatives 20250HB0602PN0610 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to be funded.(3) Recommend to the secretary specific projects and initiatives to be funded.(4) Ensure that available funding is allocated to align with other Federal and State funding to achieve the greatest impact and ensure a coordinated State effort.(5) Consult with the department, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs to develop measurable outcomes to determine the effectiveness of money allocated.(6) Develop recommendations for an administrative and organizational framework for the allocation, on a sustainable and ongoing basis, of money deposited into the fund to address opioid abuse and the overdose epidemic in this Commonwealth and the areas of focus specified under subsection (b).(d) Membership.--The council shall consist of the following members:(1) The secretary or a designee, who shall serve as the chairperson of the council.(2) The Secretary of Human Services or a designee.(3) The Secretary of Drug and Alcohol Programs or a designee.(4) A designee of the Safe and Effective Prescribing Practices Task Force established by the department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.§ 52C08. Grants.(a) Report of proposed grants.--By March 1, 2026, and each March 1 thereafter, the secretary shall submit a report of the grants proposed by the council to be awarded for the upcoming 20250HB0602PN0610 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fiscal year to the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Award.--Grants shall be awarded:(1) based on the recommendations of the council;(2) to the extent money is available through the fund or other appropriations by the General Assembly; and(3) in accordance with the purposes and duties specified under section 52C07(b) and (c) (relating to Opiate Epidemic Response Advisory Council).(c) Limitation.--No more than 3% of grant money may be used by a grantee for administrative costs.§ 52C09. Annual reports.(a) Submittal.--By January 31, 2027, and each January 31 thereafter, the council shall report to the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the 20250HB0602PN0610 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--The report under this section shall include the following:(1) Information regarding each project that receives a grant from the department and the overall role of the project in addressing the opioid addiction and overdose epidemic in this Commonwealth.(2) A description of the grantees and the activities implemented, along with measurable outcomes as determined by the council in consultation with the secretary.(3) Recommendations regarding:(i) whether the appropriations to the specified entities under this chapter should be continued, adjusted or discontinued;(ii) whether funding should be appropriated for other purposes related to opioid abuse prevention, education and treatment;(iii) the appropriate level of funding for existing and new uses; and(iv) any necessary or appropriate change in fees or assessment under this chapter.§ 52C10. Rules and regulations.The department shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0602PN0610 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627